Georgia, session 2025_26, SB367.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Code Section 31-6-47 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to exemptions
from certificate of need requirements, is amended in subsection (a) by striking "and" at the
end of paragraph (34), by replacing the period at the end of paragraph (35) with "; and", and
by adding a new paragraph to read as follows:
"(36)(A) The development, expansion, acquisition, relocation, or operation of any
health care facility, service, or equipment that is primarily and exclusively dedicated
to the treatment of cancer, including:
S. B. 367
- 1 -

LC 33 9822
(i) Any hospital, clinic, ambulatory surgical center, or freestanding facility that
provides diagnostic, therapeutic, surgical, management, or palliative care for cancer
patients;
(ii) Any medical technology or equipment used exclusively for the detection,
diagnosis, treatment, or research of cancer, including but not limited to radiation
therapy machines, linear accelerators, proton therapy systems, positron emission
tomography, and other oncological treatment modalities;
(iii) Any outpatient services, including radiation therapy, chemotherapy, infusion
therapy, and precision medicine programs, dedicated solely to cancer treatment;
(iv) Any facility engaged in clinical trials, experimental treatments, or research
exclusively related to oncology;
(v) Any hospice, rehabilitation, or supportive care facility exclusively providing
services to cancer patients; and
(vi) Any expenditure or capital expenditure associated with the construction,
development, acquisition, or other establishment of a service, service facility, or
equipment primarily and exclusively dedicated to the treatment of cancer;
(B) Facilities and services operating under the exemption provided for in this
paragraph shall:
(i) Comply with all applicable federal and state regulations for oncology care; and
(ii) Submit patient volume and treatment data to the department to verify compliance
with the exemption provided for in this paragraph;
(iii) Provide annual reports in the same manner and in accordance with Code Section
31-6-70.
(C) The exemption provided for in this paragraph shall apply regardless of ownership
structure, affiliation with an existing hospital, or location within the state."
S. B. 367
- 2 -

LC 33 9822
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
S. B. 367
- 3 -